en: Punching & Training Bags
xx: Punching & Training Bags
cs: Boxovací pytle
da: Bokse- og træningspuder
de: Box- & Trainingssäcke
es: Punchings y sacos de entrenamiento
fr: Punching-balls
it: Sacchi da pugilato
ja: サンドバッグ
nl: Stootzakken
no: Bokse- og treningssekker
pl: Worki treningowe
pt: Sacos de boxe
ru: Боксерские груши
sv: Sandsäckar och träningssäckar
tr: Kum Torbası ve Antrenman Torbaları

en: Strike Shields
xx: Strike Shields
cs: Úderové bloky
da: Sparkepuder
de: Schlagpolster
es: Escudos de trabajo
fr: Boucliers de frappe, Bouclier (Pad) de boxe
it: Paracolpi
ja: ボクシング・格闘技用ミット
nl: Trap- en stootkussens
no: Slagputer
pl: Tarcze treningowe
pt: Aparadores de chute
ru: Щиты для отработки ударов и макивары
sv: Slagkuddar
tr: Darbe Yastıkları

en: Boxing Ring Parts
xx: Boxing Ring Parts
cs: Součásti boxerských ringů
da: Boksering – dele
de: Boxringelemente
es: Piezas para rings de boxeo
fr: Pièces de ring de boxe
it: Parti per ring pugilato
ja: ボクシングリングパーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor boksringen
no: Bokseringdeler
pl: Części ringów bokserskich
pt: Peças do ringue de boxe
ru: Элементы боксерского ринга
sv: Delar till boxningsringar
tr: Boks Ringi Parçaları

en: Boxing Rings
xx: Boxing Rings
cs: Boxerské ringy
da: Bokseringe
de: Boxringe
es: Rings de boxeo
fr: Rings de boxe
it: Ring per pugilato
ja: ボクシングリング
nl: Boksringen
no: Bokseringer
pl: Ringi bokserskie
pt: Ringues de boxe
ru: Боксерские ринги
sv: Boxningsringar
tr: Boks Ringleri

en: Martial Arts Belts
xx: Martial Arts Belts
cs: Pásy pro bojová umění
da: Kampsportsbælter
de: Kampfsportgürtel
es: Cinturones de artes marciales
fr: Ceintures d'arts martiaux, Ceinture de judo
it: Cinture per arti marziali
ja: 格闘技・武術用帯
nl: Martial arts-banden
no: Kampsportbelter
pl: Pasy do sztuk walki
pt: Faixas para artes marciais
ru: Пояса для боевых искусств
sv: Kampsportsbälten
tr: Dövüş Sanatı Kuşakları

en: Martial Arts Weapons
xx: Martial Arts Weapons
cs: Zbraně pro bojová umění
da: Våben til kampsport
de: Kampfsportwaffen
es: Armas de artes marciales
fr: Armes d'arts martiaux, Arme d'entraînement, Dague
it: Armi per arti marziali
ja: 武具
nl: Martial arts-wapens
no: Kampsportvåpen
pl: Broń do sztuk walki
pt: Armas de artes marciais
ru: Оружие для боевых искусств
sv: Kampsportsvapen
tr: Dövüş Sanatı Silahları

en: Broomball Equipment
xx: Broomball Equipment
cs: Vybavení na broomball
da: Broomballudstyr
de: Broomball-Ausrüstung
es: Equipamiento para Broomball
fr: Équipement de ballon-balai
it: Attrezzature da broomball
ja: ブルームボール用品
nl: Broomballbenodigdheden
no: Utstyr til broomball
pl: Sprzęt do gry w broomball
pt: Equipamento de broomball
ru: Оборудование для брумбола
sv: Broomball
tr: Broomball Malzemeleri

en: Cheerleading
xx: Cheerleading
cs: Roztleskávání
da: Cheerleading
de: Cheerleading
es: Animadoras
fr: Cheerleading
it: Cheerleading
ja: チアリーディング
nl: Cheerleaden
no: Cheerleading
pl: Cheerleading
pt: Animação de torcida
ru: Чирлидинг
sv: Cheerleading
tr: Amigoluk

en: Cheerleading Pom Poms
xx: Cheerleading Pom Poms
cs: Pompony pro roztleskávačky
da: Pomponer
de: Cheerleader-Pompons
es: Pompones
fr: Pompons de cheerleading
it: Pon-pon da cheerleader
ja: チアポンポン
nl: Pompons voor cheerleaders
no: Cheerleadingdusker
pl: Pompony dla cheerleaderek
pt: Pompons de líderes de torcida
ru: Помпоны для чирлидинга
sv: Pom-poms
tr: Amigo Ponponları

en: Coaching & Officiating
xx: Coaching & Officiating
cs: Potřeby pro trenéry a rozhodčí
da: Dommerudstyr
de: Trainer- & Schiedsrichterausrüstung
es: Accesorios para árbitros
fr: Accessoires d'entraînement et d'arbitrage
it: Arbitraggio e allenamento
ja: 指導者・審判向け用品
nl: Coachen en scheidsrechteren
no: Utstyr til trenere og dommere
pl: Akcesoria sędziowskie
pt: Treinamento e arbitragem
ru: Принадлежности для судей и тренеров
sv: Domarutrustning
tr: Koçluk ve Hakemlik

en: Captains Armbands
xx: Captains Armbands
cs: Kapitánské pásky
da: Anførerarmbånd
de: Kapitänsbinden
es: Brazaletes para capitán
fr: Brassards de capitaine
it: Fasce da capitano
ja: キャプテンマーク
nl: Aanvoerdersbanden
no: Kapteinbånd
pl: Opaski dla kapitanów drużyn
pt: Braçadeiras de capitão
ru: Капитанские повязки
sv: Armband för lagkaptener
tr: Kaptanlık Pazu Bantları

en: Field & Court Boundary Markers
xx: Field & Court Boundary Markers
cs: Značení hranic hřiště
da: Banemarkører
de: Begrenzungsmarkierungen für Spielfelder
es: Marcadores de límites para pistas y campos
fr: Marquage des lignes de terrains et courts
it: Strumenti segnacampo per sport
ja: フィールド・コート用境界マーカー
nl: Veld- en baanmarkeringen
no: Banemerking
pl: Materiały i narzędzia do oznaczania granic boisk i kortów
pt: Marcadores de limite para campos e quadras
ru: Инструменты и средства для нанесения разметки на поля и площадки
sv: Gränsmarkörer för sport- och idrottsplaner
tr: Saha ve Kort Sınırı Çizme Araçları

en: Flip Coins & Discs
xx: Flip Coins & Discs
cs: Losovací mince
da: Plat og krone-mønter
de: Schiedsrichter-Münzen
es: Monedas y discos para sorteo de campo
fr: Pièces ou pions pile ou face
it: Monete e dischi per arbitri
ja: トス用コイン・ディスク
nl: Tossmunten
no: Dommermynter og brikker til resultattavler
pl: Żetony sędziowskie
pt: Moedas e discos
ru: Монеты и диски для подбрасывания
sv: Slantsingling
tr: Yazı-Tura Paraları ve Diskleri

en: Linesman Flags
xx: Linesman Flags
cs: Praporky pro pomezní rozhodčí
da: Linjevogterflag
de: Linienrichterfahnen
es: Banderas para jueces de línea
fr: Drapeaux de touche
it: Bandierine da guardalinee
ja: 副審用フラッグ
nl: Grensrechtervlaggen
no: Linjemannflagg
pl: Chorągiewki sędziów liniowych
pt: Bandeirinhas
ru: Флажки для линейных судей
sv: Linjemanflaggor
tr: Yardımcı Hakem Bayrakları

en: Penalty Cards & Flags
xx: Penalty Cards & Flags
cs: Penaltové karty a praporky
da: Dommerkort og -flag
de: Strafkarten & -flaggen
es: Tarjetas de arbitraje
fr: Cartons et drapeaux d'arbitrage
it: Cartellini e bandierine
ja: ペナルティカード
nl: Strafkaarten en -vlaggen
no: Straffekort og -flagg
pl: Kartki i flagi karne
pt: Cartões e bandeiras de penalidade
ru: Штрафные карты и флажки
sv: Utvisningskort
tr: Penaltı Kartları ve Bayrakları

en: Pitch Counters
xx: Pitch Counters
cs: Počítadla nadhozů
da: Kasttællere
de: Pitch Counter
es: Contadores de béisbol
fr: Compteurs de lancers
it: Contatori per lanci
ja: ピッチ計
nl: Pitchtellers
no: Slagteller
pl: Liczniki rzutów miotacza
pt: Contadores de arremessos
ru: Бейсбольные счетчики
sv: Slagräknare
tr: Atış Sayaçları

en: Referee Stands & Chairs
xx: Referee Stands & Chairs
cs: Sedačky pro rozhodčí
da: Dommerstole
de: Schiedsrichterstände & -stühle
es: Sillas y plataformas para árbitros
fr: Chaises d'arbitrage
it: Sedie per arbitri
ja: 審判台
nl: Scheidsrechterstoelen
no: Dommerstoler
pl: Stanowiska i krzesła sędziowskie
pt: Cadeiras para árbitro
ru: Судейские стойки и кресла
sv: Domarstolar
tr: Hakem Stantları ve Sandalyeleri

en: Referee Wallets
xx: Referee Wallets
cs: Pouzdra na karty pro rozhodčí
da: Dommermapper
de: Schiedsrichtermappen
es: Carteras para árbitros
fr: Portefeuilles d'arbitrage
it: Portafogli per arbitri
ja: 審判用カードケース
nl: Scheidsrechtersmapjes
no: Dommermapper
pl: Etui na kartki sędziowskie
pt: Carteiras para árbitro
ru: Судейские сумки
sv: Domarpåsar
tr: Hakem Cüzdanları

en: Scoreboards
xx: Scoreboards
cs: Výsledkové tabule
da: Pointtavler
de: Anzeigetafeln
es: Marcadores
fr: Tableaux de score
it: Tabelloni segnapunti
ja: スコアボード
nl: Scoreborden
no: Poengtavler
pl: Tablice wyników
pt: Placares
ru: Спортивные табло
sv: Poängtavlor
tr: Skorbordlar

en: Sport & Safety Whistles
xx: Sport & Safety Whistles
cs: Píšťalky pro rozhodčí
da: Dommerfløjter
de: Schiedsrichter- & Trainerpfeifen
es: Silbatos para árbitros
fr: Sifflets de sport et de sécurité
it: Fischietti per arbitri e allenatori
ja: 審判用ホイッスル
nl: Coach- en scheidsrechterfluiten
no: Sports- og sikkerhetsfløyter
pl: Gwizdki sędziowskie
pt: Apitos de arbitragem e treinamento
ru: Свистки для судей и тренеров
sv: Domarvisslor
tr: Hakem ve Koç Düdükleri